Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-923
Simulating legal process; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of simulating legal process if he sends, delivers, or mails or in any manner shall cause to be sent, delivered, or mailed, any paper or document simulating or intended to simulate a summons, complaint, writ, or other court process of any kind, to any person, firm, company, or corporation, for the purpose and intent of forcing payment of any alleged claim, debt, or legal obligation.

(2) Simulating legal process is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 208.